Utah statutes.
11-42-402.   Notice of assessment and board of equalization hearing.
Each notice required under Subsection 11-42-401(2)(a)(iii) shall:
(1)  state:
(a)  that an assessment list is completed and available for examination at the
offices of the local entity;
(b)  the total estimated or actual cost of the improvements;
(c)  the amount of the total estimated or actual cost of the proposed
improvements to be paid by the local entity;
(d)  the amount of the assessment to be levied against benefitted property
within the assessment area;
(e)  the assessment method used to calculate the proposed assessment;
(f)  the unit cost used to calculate the assessments shown on the assessment
list, based on the assessment method used to calculate the proposed
assessment; and
(g)  the dates, times, and place of the board of equalization hearings under
Subsection 11-42-401(2)(b);
(2)  beginning at least 20 but not more than 35 days before the first hearing
of the board of equalization:
(a) (i)  be published at least once in a newspaper of general circulation
within the local entity's jurisdictional boundaries; or
(ii)  if there is no newspaper of general circulation within the local
entity's jurisdictional boundaries, be posted in at least three public places
within the local entity's jurisdictional boundaries; and
(b)  be published in accordance with Section 45-1-101 for 35 days before the
first hearing of the board of equalization; and
(3)  be mailed, postage prepaid, within 10 days after the first publication or
posting of the notice under Subsection (2) to each owner of property to be
assessed within the proposed assessment area at the property owner's mailing
address.
